California statutes. Public Resources Code
(b) Notwithstanding subdivision (a), compliance with this division may be achieved for the adoption in a city or county general plan, without any additions or change, of all or any part of the regional plan prepared pursuant to the Tahoe Regional Planning Compact and implementing regulations by reviewing environmental documents prepared by the Tahoe Regional Planning Agency addressing the plan, providing an analysis pursuant to this division of any significant effect on the environment not addressed in the environmental documents, and proceeding in accordance with Section 21081. This subdivision does not exempt a city or county from complying with the public review and notice requirements of this division.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1988, Ch. 493, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

21083.6.

In the event that a project requires both an environmental impact report prepared pursuant to the requirements of this division and an environmental impact statement prepared pursuant to the requirements of the National Environmental Policy Act of 1969, an applicant may request and the lead agency may waive the time limits established pursuant to Section 21100.2 or 21151.5 if it finds that additional time is required to prepare a combined environmental impact report-environmental impact statement and that the time required to prepare such a combined document would be shorter than that required to prepare each document separately.

(History: Added by Stats. 1977, Ch. 1200.)
-------------------------------------------

21083.7.

(a) In the event that a project requires both an environmental impact report prepared pursuant to the requirements of this division and an environmental impact statement prepared pursuant to the requirements of the National Environmental Policy Act of 1969, the lead agency shall, whenever possible, use the environmental impact statement as such environmental impact report as provided in Section 21083.5. 

(b) In order to implement this section, each lead agency to which this section is applicable shall do both of the following, as soon as possible:

(1) Consult with the federal agency required to prepare such environmental impact statement. 

(2) Notify the federal agency required to prepare the environmental impact statement regarding any scoping meeting for the proposed project.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2000, Ch. 387, Sec. 1.   Effective September 11, 2000.)
-------------------------------------------

21083.8.1.

(a) (1) For purposes of this section, “reuse plan” for a military base means an initial plan for the reuse of a military base adopted by a local government or a redevelopment agency in the form of a general plan, general plan amendment, specific plan, redevelopment plan, or other planning document, except that the reuse plan shall also consist of a statement of development policies, include a diagram or diagrams illustrating its provisions, and make the designation required in paragraph (2). “Military base” or “base” means a military base or reservation either closed or realigned by, or scheduled for closure or realignment by, the federal government.

(2) The reuse plan shall designate the proposed
 general distribution and general location of development intensity for housing, business, industry, open space, recreation, natural resources, public buildings and grounds, roads and other transportation facilities, infrastructure, and other categories of public and private uses of land.

(b) (1) When preparing and certifying an environmental impact report for a reuse plan, including when utilizing an environmental impact statement pursuant to Section 21083.5, the determination of whether the reuse plan may have a significant effect on the environment may be made in the context of the physical conditions that were present at the time that the federal decision became final for the closure or realignment of the base. The no project alternative analyzed in the environmental impact report shall discuss the existing conditions on the base, as they exist at the time that the environmental impact report is prepared, as well as
 what could be reasonably expected to occur in the foreseeable future if the reuse plan were not approved, based on current plans and consistent with available infrastructure and services.

(2) For purposes of this division, all public and private activities taken pursuant to, or in furtherance of, a reuse plan shall be deemed to be a single project. However, further environmental review of any public or private activity taken pursuant to, or in furtherance of, a reuse plan shall be conducted if any of the events specified in Section 21166 have occurred.

(c) Prior to preparing an environmental impact report for which a lead agency chooses to utilize the provisions of this section, the lead agency shall do all of the following:

(A) Hold a public hearing at which is discussed the federal environmental impact statement
 prepared for, or in the process of being prepared for, the closure of the military base. The discussion shall include the significant effects on the environment examined in the environmental impact statement, potential methods of mitigating those effects, including feasible alternatives, and the mitigative effects of federal, state, and local laws applicable to future nonmilitary activities. Prior to the close of the hearing, the lead agency may specify the baseline conditions for the reuse plan environmental impact report prepared, or in the process of being prepared, for the closure of the base. The lead agency may specify particular physical conditions that it will examine in greater detail than were examined in the environmental impact statement. Notice of the hearing shall be given as provided in Section 21092. The hearing may be continued from time to time.

(B) Identify pertinent responsible agencies and trustee agencies and consult with
 those agencies prior to the public hearing as to the application of their regulatory policies and permitting standards to the proposed baseline for environmental analysis, as well as to the reuse plan and planned future nonmilitary land uses of the base. The affected agencies shall have not less than 30 days prior to the public hearing to review the proposed reuse plan and to submit their comments to the lead agency.

(C) At the close of the hearing, the lead agency shall state in writing how the lead agency intends to integrate the baseline for analysis with the reuse planning and environmental review process, taking into account the adopted environmental standards of the community, including, but not limited to, the applicable general plan, specific plan, and redevelopment plan, and including other applicable provisions of adopted congestion management plans, habitat conservation or natural communities conservation plans, integrated waste
 management plans, and county hazardous waste management plans.

(D) At the close of the hearing, the lead agency shall state, in writing, the specific economic or social reasons, including, but not limited to, new job creation, opportunities for employment of skilled workers, availability of low- and moderate-income housing, and economic continuity, which support the selection of the baseline.

(d) (1) Nothing in this section shall in any way limit the scope of a review or determination of significance of the presence of hazardous or toxic wastes, substances, or materials including, but not limited to, contaminated soils and groundwater, nor shall the regulation of hazardous or toxic wastes, substances, or materials be constrained by prior levels of activity that existed at the time that the federal agency decision to close the military base became final.

(2) This section does not apply to any project undertaken pursuant to Chapter 6.5 (commencing with Section 25100) of Division 20 of, or Part 2 (commencing with Section 78000) of Division 45 of, the Health and Safety Code, or pursuant to the Porter-Cologne Water Quality Control Act (Division 7 (commencing with Section 13000) of the Water Code).

(3) This section may apply to any reuse plan environmental impact report for which a notice of preparation pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 21092 is issued within one year from the date that the federal record of decision was rendered for the military base closure or realignment and reuse, or prior to January 1, 1997, whichever is later, if the environmental impact report is completed and certified within five years from the date that the federal record of decision was rendered.

(e) All subsequent development at the military base shall be subject to all applicable federal, state, or local laws, including, but not limited to, those relating to air quality, water quality, traffic, threatened and endangered species, noise, and hazardous or toxic wastes, substances, or materials.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 258, Sec. 116.   (AB 2327)   Effective January 1, 2023.   Operative January 1, 2024, pursuant to Sec. 130 of Stats. 2022, Ch. 258.)
-------------------------------------------

21083.9.

(a) Notwithstanding Section 21080.4, 21104, or 21153, a lead agency shall call at least one scoping meeting for either of the following:

(1) A proposed project that may affect highways or other facilities under the jurisdiction of the Department of Transportation if the meeting is requested by the department. The lead agency shall call the scoping meeting as soon as possible, but not later than 30 days after receiving the request from the Department of Transportation.

(2) A project of statewide, regional, or areawide significance.

(b) The lead agency shall provide notice of at least one scoping meeting held pursuant to paragraph (2) of
 subdivision (a) to all of the following:

(1) A county or city that borders on a county or city within which the project is located, unless otherwise designated annually by agreement between the lead agency and the county or city.

(2) A responsible agency.

(3) A public agency that has jurisdiction by law with respect to the project.

(4) A transportation planning agency or public agency required to be consulted pursuant to Section 21092.4.

(5) A public agency, organization, or individual who
 has filed a written request for the notice.

(c) For a public agency, organization, or individual that is required to be provided notice of a lead agency public meeting, the requirement for notice of a scoping meeting pursuant to subdivision (b) may be met by including the notice of a scoping meeting in the public meeting notice.

(d) A scoping meeting that is held in the city or county within which the project is located pursuant to the federal National Environmental Policy Act of 1969 (42 U.S.C. Sec. 4321 et seq.) and the regulations adopted pursuant to that act shall be deemed to satisfy the requirement that a scoping meeting be held for a project subject to paragraph (2) of
 subdivision (a) if the lead agency meets the notice requirements of subdivision (b) or subdivision (c).

(e) The referral of a proposed action to adopt or substantially amend a general plan to a city or county pursuant to paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) of Section 65352 of the Government Code may be conducted concurrently with the scoping meeting required pursuant to this section, and the city or county may submit its comments as provided pursuant to subdivision (b) of that section at the scoping meeting.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 218, Sec. 1.   (SB 972)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

21084.

(a) The guidelines prepared and adopted pursuant to Section 21083 shall include a list of classes of projects that have been determined not to have a significant effect on the environment and that shall be exempt from this division. In adopting the guidelines, the Secretary of the Natural Resources Agency shall make a finding that the listed classes of projects referred to in this section do not have a significant effect on the environment.

(b) A project’s greenhouse gas emissions shall not, in and of themselves, be deemed to cause an exemption adopted pursuant to subdivision (a) to be inapplicable if the project complies with all applicable regulations or requirements adopted to implement statewide, regional, or local plans consistent with Section 15183.5 of Title
 14 of the California Code of Regulations.

(c) A project that may result in damage to scenic resources, including, but not limited to, trees, historic buildings, rock outcroppings, or similar resources, within a highway designated as an official state scenic highway, pursuant to Article 2.5 (commencing with Section 260) of Chapter 2 of Division 1 of the Streets and Highways Code, shall not be exempted from this division pursuant to subdivision (a). This subdivision does not apply to improvements as mitigation for a project for which a negative declaration has been approved or an environmental impact report has been certified.

(d) A project located on a site that is included on any list compiled pursuant to Section 65962.5 of the Government Code shall not be exempted from this division pursuant to subdivision (a).

(e) A project that may cause a substantial adverse change in the significance of a historical resource, as specified in Section 21084.1, shall not be exempted from this division pursuant to subdivision (a).

(History: Amended by Stats. 2013, Ch. 76, Sec. 175.   (AB 383)   Effective January 1, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------

21084.1.

A project that may cause a substantial adverse change in the significance of an historical resource is a project that may have a significant effect on the environment. For purposes of this section, an historical resource is a resource listed in, or determined to be eligible for listing in, the California Register of Historical Resources. Historical resources included in a local register of historical resources, as defined in subdivision (k) of Section 5020.1, or deemed significant pursuant to criteria set forth in subdivision (g) of Section 5024.1, are presumed to be historically or culturally significant for purposes of this section, unless the preponderance of the evidence demonstrates that the resource is not historically or culturally significant. The fact that a resource is not listed in, or determined to be eligible for listing in, the California Register of Historical Resources, not included in a local register of historical resources, or not deemed significant pursuant to criteria set forth in subdivision (g) of Section 5024.1 shall not preclude a lead agency from determining whether the resource may be an historical resource for purposes of this section.

(History: Added by Stats. 1992, Ch. 1075, Sec. 8.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

21084.2.

A project with an effect that may cause a substantial adverse change in the significance of a tribal cultural resource is a project that may have a significant effect on the environment.

(History: Added by Stats. 2014, Ch. 532, Sec. 9.   (AB 52)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

21084.3.

(a) Public agencies shall, when feasible, avoid damaging effects to any tribal cultural resource.

(b) If the lead agency determines that a project may cause a substantial adverse change to a tribal cultural resource, and measures are not otherwise identified in the consultation process provided in Section 21080.3.2, the following are examples of mitigation measures that, if feasible, may be considered to avoid or minimize the significant adverse impacts:

(1) Avoidance and preservation of the resources in place, including, but not limited to, planning and construction to avoid the resources and protect the cultural and natural context, or
 planning greenspace, parks, or other open space, to incorporate the resources with culturally appropriate protection and management criteria.

(2) Treating the resource with culturally appropriate dignity taking into account the tribal cultural values and meaning of the resource, including, but not limited to, the following:

(A) Protecting the cultural character and integrity of the resource.

(B) Protecting the traditional use of the resource.

(C) Protecting the confidentiality of the resource.

(3) Permanent conservation easements or other interests in real property, with culturally appropriate management criteria for the purposes of preserving or utilizing the resources or places.

(4) Protecting the resource.

(History: Added by Stats. 2014, Ch. 532, Sec. 10.   (AB 52)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

21085.

For purposes of this division, for residential projects, the effects of noise generated by project occupants and their guests on human beings is not a significant effect on the environment.

(History: Added by Stats. 2023, Ch. 160, Sec. 1.   (AB 1307)   Effective September 7, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

21085.2.

(a) For purposes of this section, the following definitions apply:

(1) “Long-range development plan” means a physical development and land use plan to meet the academic and institutional objectives for a particular campus or medical center of public higher education.

(2) “Public higher education” means the institutions described in subdivision (a) of Section 66010 of the Education Code.

(3) “Residential or mixed-use housing project” means a project consisting of residential uses only or a mix of residential and nonresidential uses, with at least two-thirds of the square footage of the development designated for
 residential uses.

(4) “Substantially surrounded” means at least 75 percent of the perimeter of the project site adjoins, or is separated only by an improved public right-of-way from, parcels that are developed with qualified urban uses.

(b) Notwithstanding any other law or regulation, institutions of public higher education shall not be required, in an environmental impact report prepared for a residential or mixed-use housing project, to consider alternatives to the location of the residential or mixed-use housing project if both of the following requirements are met:

(1) The residential or mixed-use housing project is located on a site that is no more than five acres and is substantially surrounded by qualified urban uses.

(2) The residential or
 mixed-use housing project has already been evaluated in the environmental impact report for the most recent long-range development plan for the applicable campus.

(History: Added by Stats. 2023, Ch. 160, Sec. 2.   (AB 1307)   Effective September 7, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

21086.

(a) A public agency may, at any time, request the addition or deletion of a class of projects, to the list designated pursuant to Section 21084. That request shall be made in writing to the Office of Planning and Research and shall include information supporting the public agency’s position that the class of projects does, or does not, have a significant effect on the environment.

(b) The Office of Planning and Research shall review each request and, as soon as possible, shall submit its recommendation to the Secretary of the Resources Agency. Following the receipt of that recommendation, the Secretary of the Resources Agency may add or delete the class of projects to the list of classes of projects designated pursuant to Section 21084 that are exempt from the requirements of this division.

(c) The addition or deletion of a class of projects, as provided in this section, to the list specified in Section 21084 shall constitute an amendment to the guidelines adopted pursuant to Section 21083 and shall be adopted in the manner prescribed in Sections 21083 and 21084.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2004, Ch. 689, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------

21087.

(a) For purposes of this section, the following definitions apply:

(1) “Equivalent documentation” means a plan or other written documentation described in paragraph (3) of subdivision (d) of Section 21080.5.

(2) “Sensitive receptors” has the same meaning as set forth in Section 51010.5 of the Government Code.

(b) For a project that includes the construction of a pipeline transporting carbon dioxide subject to the Elder California Pipeline Safety Act of 1981 (Chapter 5.5 (commencing with Section 51010) of Part 1 of Division 1 of Title 5 of the Government Code), the lead agency shall prepare or cause to be prepared and
 certify an environmental impact report consistent with this division or equivalent documentation.

(c) (1) In addition to other notices required by this division or by another law, the lead agency shall, upon the completion of a draft environmental impact report or draft equivalent documentation, provide a notice to owners and operators of sensitive receptors that are within one-quarter mile of the proposed pipeline and to the State Fire Marshal in a manner consistent with Section 21092, that includes all of the following:

(A) A brief description of the proposed pipeline that includes the proposed map required by subdivision (a) of Section 51015.06 of the Government Code.

(B) The proposed location of the proposed pipeline depicted on a United States Geological Survey topographical map identified
 by quadrangle name.

(C) An address where copies of the draft document are available.

(D) The review period during which comments will be received on the draft document.

(2) This subdivision shall not be construed in any manner that results in the invalidation of an action by the lead agency because of the failure of a person to receive a notice under this subdivision if there has been substantial compliance with the requirements of this subdivision.

(d) (1) At least 60 days before certification of the environmental impact report or the adoption of equivalent documentation, the lead agency shall notify the State Fire Marshal of the project and provide sufficient information for the State Fire Marshal to make a determination pursuant
 to this subdivision.

(2) Upon notification of the project, the State Fire Marshal shall provide to the lead agency a written confirmation whether the proposed pipeline is consistent with the requirements of the Elder California Pipeline Safety Act of 1981 (Chapter 5.5 (commencing with Section 51010) of Part 1 of Division 1 of Title 5 of the Government Code).

(3) The State Fire Marshal shall make publicly available on its internet website the determination made pursuant to paragraph (1).

(History: Added by Stats. 2025, Ch. 529, Sec. 11.   (SB 614)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

21088.

The Secretary of the Resources Agency shall provide for the timely distribution to all public agencies of the guidelines and any amendments or changes thereto. In addition, the Secretary of the Resources Agency may provide for publication of a bulletin to provide public notice of the guidelines, or any amendments or changes thereto, and of the completion of environmental impact reports prepared in compliance with this division.

(History: Added by Stats. 1972, Ch. 1154.)
-------------------------------------------

21089.

(a) A lead agency may charge and collect a reasonable fee from a person proposing a project subject to this division in order to recover the estimated costs incurred by the lead agency in preparing a negative declaration or an environmental impact report for the project and for procedures necessary to comply with this division on the project. Litigation expenses, costs, and fees incurred in actions alleging noncompliance with this division under Section 21167 are not recoverable under this section.

(b) The Department of Fish and Game may charge and collect filing fees, as provided in Section 711.4 of the Fish and Game Code. Notwithstanding Section 21080.1, a finding required under Section
 21081, or a project approved under a certified regulatory program authorized pursuant to Section 21080.5 is not operative, vested, or final until the filing fees required pursuant to Section 711.4 of the Fish and Game Code are paid.

(c) (1) A public agency may charge and collect a reasonable fee from members of the public for a copy of an environmental document not to exceed the cost of reproducing the environmental document. A public agency may provide the environmental document in an electronic format as provided pursuant to Sections 7922.570 to 7922.580, inclusive, of the Government Code.

(2) For purposes of this subdivision, “environmental document” means an initial study, negative declaration, mitigated negative declaration, draft and final environmental
 impact report, a document prepared as a substitute for an environmental impact report, negative declaration, or mitigated negative declaration under a program certified pursuant to Section 21080.5, and a document prepared under the federal National Environmental Policy Act of 1969 (42 U.S.C. Sec. 4321 et seq.) and used by a state or local agency in the place of the initial study, negative declaration, mitigated negative declaration, or an environmental impact report.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 615, Sec. 379.   (AB 474)   Effective January 1, 2022.   Operative January 1, 2023, pursuant to Sec. 463 of Stats. 2021, Ch. 615.)
-------------------------------------------

21090.

(a) An environmental impact report for a redevelopment plan may be a master environmental impact report, program environmental impact report, or a project environmental impact report. Any environmental impact report for a redevelopment plan shall specify the type of environmental impact report that is prepared for the redevelopment plan.

(b) If the environmental impact report for a redevelopment plan is a project environmental impact report, all public and private activities or undertakings pursuant to, or in furtherance of, a redevelopment plan shall be deemed to be a single project. However, further environmental review of any public or private activity or undertaking pursuant to, or in furtherance of, a redevelopment plan for which a project environmental impact report has been certified shall be conducted if any of the events specified in Section 21166 have occurred.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2002, Ch. 625, Sec. 3.   Effective September 17, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------

21090.1.

For all purposes of this division, a geothermal exploratory project shall be deemed to be separate and distinct from any subsequent geothermal field development project as defined in Section 65928.5 of the Government Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 1978, Ch. 1271.)
-------------------------------------------

21091.

(a) The public review period for a draft environmental impact report shall not be less than 30 days. If the draft environmental impact report is for a proposed project where a state agency is the lead agency, a responsible agency, or a trustee agency; a state agency otherwise has jurisdiction by law with respect to the project; or the proposed project is of sufficient statewide, regional, or areawide significance as determined pursuant to the guidelines certified and adopted pursuant to Section 21083, the review period shall be at least 45 days, and the lead agency shall provide the document, in an electronic form as required by the Office of Planning and Research, to the State Clearinghouse for review and comment by state agencies.

(b) The public review period for
 a proposed negative declaration or proposed mitigated negative declaration shall not be less than 20 days. If the proposed negative declaration or proposed mitigated negative declaration is for a proposed project where a state agency is the lead agency, a responsible agency, or a trustee agency; a state agency otherwise has jurisdiction by law with respect to the project; or the proposed project is of sufficient statewide, regional, or areawide significance as determined pursuant to the guidelines certified and adopted pursuant to Section 21083, the review period shall be at least 30 days, and the lead agency shall provide the document, in an electronic form as required by the Office of Planning and Research, to the State Clearinghouse for review and comment by state agencies.

(c) (1) Notwithstanding subdivisions (a) and (b), if a draft environmental impact report, proposed negative declaration, or proposed mitigated
 negative declaration is submitted to the State Clearinghouse for review and the period of review by the State Clearinghouse is longer than the public review period established pursuant to subdivision (a) or (b), whichever is applicable, the public review period shall be at least as long as the period of review and comment by state agencies as established by the State Clearinghouse.

(2) The public review period and the state agency review period may, but are not required to, begin and end at the same time. Day one of the state agency review period shall be the date that the State Clearinghouse distributes the CEQA document to state agencies.

(3) If the submittal of a CEQA document is determined by the State Clearinghouse to be complete, the State Clearinghouse shall distribute the document within three working days from the date of receipt. The State Clearinghouse shall specify the
 information that will be required in order to determine the completeness of the submittal of a CEQA document.

(d) (1) The lead agency shall consider comments it receives on a draft environmental impact report, proposed negative declaration, or proposed mitigated negative declaration if those comments are received within the public review period.

(2) (A) With respect to the consideration of comments received on a draft environmental impact report, the lead agency shall evaluate comments on environmental issues that are received from persons who have reviewed the draft and shall prepare a written response pursuant to subparagraph (B). The lead agency may also respond to comments that are received after the close of the public review period.

(B) The written response shall
 describe the disposition of each significant environmental issue that is raised by commenters. The responses shall be prepared consistent with Section 15088 of Title 14 of the California Code of Regulations.

(3) (A) With respect to the consideration of comments received on a draft environmental impact report, proposed negative declaration, proposed mitigated negative declaration, or notice pursuant to Section 21080.4, the lead agency shall accept comments via email and shall treat email comments as equivalent to written comments.

(B) Any law or regulation relating to written comments received on a draft environmental impact report, proposed negative declaration, proposed mitigated negative declaration, or notice received pursuant to Section 21080.4 shall also apply to email comments received for those reasons.

(e) (1) Criteria for shorter review periods by the State Clearinghouse for documents that must be submitted to the State Clearinghouse shall be set forth in the written guidelines issued by the Office of Planning and Research and made available to the public.

(2) Those shortened review periods may not be less than 30 days for a draft environmental impact report and 20 days for a negative declaration.

(3) A request for a shortened review period shall only be made in writing by the decisionmaking body of the lead agency to the Office of Planning and Research. The decisionmaking body may designate by resolution or ordinance a person authorized to request a shortened review period. A designated person shall notify the decisionmaking body of this request.

(4) A request approved by the State Clearinghouse shall be consistent with the criteria set forth in the written guidelines of the Office of Planning and Research.

(5) A shortened review period may not be approved by the Office of Planning and Research for a proposed project of statewide, regional, or areawide environmental significance as determined pursuant to Section 21083.

(6) An approval of a shortened review period shall be given prior to, and reflected in, the public notice required pursuant to Section 21092.

(f) Before carrying out or approving a project for which a negative declaration has been adopted, the lead agency shall consider the negative declaration together with comments that were received and considered pursuant to paragraph (1) of subdivision
 (d).

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 97, Sec. 3.   (AB 819)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

21091.5.

Notwithstanding subdivision (a) of Section 21091, or any other provision of this division, the public review period for a draft environmental impact report prepared for a proposed project involving the expansion or enlargement of a publicly owned airport requiring the acquisition of any tide and submerged lands or other lands subject to the public trust for commerce, navigation, or fisheries, or any interest therein, shall be not less than 120 days.

(History: Added by Stats. 2001, Ch. 534, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------

21092.

(a) A lead agency that is preparing an environmental impact report or a negative declaration or making a determination pursuant to subdivision (c) of Section 21157.1 shall provide public notice of that fact within a reasonable period of time prior to certification of the environmental impact report, adoption of the negative declaration, or making the determination pursuant to subdivision (c) of Section 21157.1.

(b) (1) The notice shall specify the period during which comments will be received on the draft environmental impact report or negative declaration, and shall include the date, time, and place of any public meetings or hearings on the proposed project, a brief description of the proposed project and its location, the significant effects
 on the environment, if any, anticipated as a result of the project, the address where copies of the draft environmental impact report or negative declaration, and all documents referenced in the draft environmental impact report or negative declaration, are available for review, and a description of how the draft environmental impact report or negative declaration can be provided in an electronic format.

(2) This section shall not be construed in any manner that results in the invalidation of an action because of the alleged inadequacy of the notice content if there has been substantial compliance with the notice content requirements of this section.

(3) The notice required by this section shall be given to the last known name and address of all organizations and individuals who have previously requested notice, and shall also be given by posting the notice on the internet website
 of the lead agency and by at least one of the following procedures:

(A) Publication, no fewer times than required by Section 6061 of the Government Code, by the public agency in a newspaper of general circulation in the area affected by the proposed project. If more than one area will be affected, the notice shall be published in the newspaper of largest circulation from among the newspapers of general circulation in those areas.

(B) Posting of notice by the lead agency on- and off-site in the area where the project is to be located.

(C) Direct mailing to the owners and occupants of contiguous property shown on the latest equalized assessment roll.

(c) For a project involving the burning of municipal wastes, hazardous waste, or refuse-derived fuel,
 including, but not limited to, tires, meeting the qualifications of subdivision (d), notice shall be given to all organizations and individuals who have previously requested notice and shall also be given by at least the procedures specified in subparagraphs (A), (B), and (C) of paragraph (3) of subdivision (b). In addition, notification shall be given by direct mailing to the owners and occupants of property within one-fourth of a mile of any parcel or parcels on which is located a project subject to this subdivision.

(d) The notice requirements of subdivision (c) apply to both of the following:

(1) The construction of a new facility.

(2) The expansion of an existing facility that burns hazardous waste which would increase its permitted capacity by more than 10 percent. For purposes of this paragraph, the amount of
 expansion of an existing facility shall be calculated by comparing the proposed facility capacity with whichever of the following is applicable:

(A) The facility capacity approved in the facility’s hazardous waste facilities permit pursuant to Section 25200 of the Health and Safety Code or its grant of interim status pursuant to Section 25200.5 of the Health and Safety Code, or the facility capacity authorized in any state or local agency permit allowing the construction or operation of a facility for the burning of hazardous waste, granted before January 1, 1990.

(B) The facility capacity authorized in the facility’s original hazardous waste facilities permit, grant of interim status, or any state or local agency permit allowing the construction or operation of a facility for the burning of hazardous waste, granted on or after January 1, 1990.

(e) The notice requirements specified in subdivision (b) or (c) shall not preclude a public agency from providing additional notice by other means if the agency so desires, or from providing the public notice required by this section at the same time and in the same manner as public notice otherwise required by law for the project.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 97, Sec. 4.   (AB 819)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

21092.1.

When significant new information is added to an environmental impact report after notice has been given pursuant to Section 21092 and consultation has occurred pursuant to Sections 21104 and 21153, but prior to certification, the public agency shall give notice again pursuant to Section 21092, and consult again pursuant to Sections 21104 and 21153 before certifying the environmental impact report.

(History: Added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 1514, Sec. 7.)
-------------------------------------------

21092.2.

(a) The notices required pursuant to Sections 21080.4, 21083.9, 21092, 21108, 21152, and 21161 shall be mailed to every person who has filed a written request for notices with either the clerk of the governing body or, if there is no governing body, the director of the agency. If the agency offers to provide the notices by email, upon filing a written request for notices, a person may request that the notices be provided to that person by email. The request may also be filed with any other person designated by the governing body or director to receive these requests. The agency may require requests for notices to be annually renewed. The public agency may charge a fee, except to other public agencies, that is reasonably related to the costs of providing this service.

(b) Subdivision (a) shall not be construed in any manner that results in the invalidation of an action because of the failure of a person to receive a requested notice, if there has been substantial compliance with the requirements of this section.

(c) The notices required pursuant to Sections 21080.4 and 21161 shall be provided by the State Clearinghouse to any legislator in whose district the project has an environmental impact, if the legislator requests the notice and the State Clearinghouse has received it.

(d) The lead agency shall post the notices specified in subdivision (a) on its internet website, if any.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 97, Sec. 5.   (AB 819)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------
